North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143C. State Budget Act.
Article 7. Federal and Other Receipts.

§ 143C-7-1.
Funds creating an obligation.

Report to Director. — A State agency, other than the judicial branch, that submits to the federal government or to any other party an application for funds that will be subject to this Chapter shall first provide to the Director a copy of the application along with any related information the Director may require. The judicial branch shall provide the Director with a copy of the application and any related information after making the application.

Contract Provision. — A State agency that receives funds pursuant to an application that must be reported to the Director under subsection (a) of this section shall include in any related contract or other grant instrument a clause specifically stating that the expenditure of money deposited in the State treasury is subject to acts of appropriation by the General Assembly.

History.

2006-203, s. 3; 2007-393, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-393, s. 9, effective October 1, 2007, in subsection (a), substituted “agency, other than the judicial branch,” for “agency” at the beginning of the first sentence and added the second sentence.

§ 143C-7-2.
Federal Block Grants.

Plans Submitted and Reviewed. — The Secretary of each State agency that receives and administers federal Block Grant funds shall prepare and submit the agency’s Block Grant plans to the Director of the Budget. The Director of the Budget shall submit the Block Grant plans to the General Assembly as part of the Recommended State Budget submitted pursuant to

G.S. 143C-3-5

.

Information To Be Included in Plans. — Each State agency shall submit a separate Block Grant plan for each Block Grant received and administered by the agency, and each plan shall include all of the following:

A delineation of the proposed dollar amount by activity and by category, including dollar amounts to be used for administrative costs.

A comparison of the proposed funding with two prior years’ program budgets.

History.

2006-203, s. 3; 2013-360, s. 6.12(p).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 6.12(p), effective July 1, 2013, substituted “the General Assembly as part of the Recommended State Budget submitted pursuant to

G.S. 143C-3-5

” for “the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly not later than February 28 of each odd-numbered calendar year and not later than April 30 of each even-numbered calendar year” in the second sentence of subsection (a).